Kentucky statutes. TITLE XLII Miscellaneous Practice Provisions
CHAPTER 452 Venue and Change of Venue

452.005.
Venue for civil claims against the Commonwealth — Certification of service on Attorney General — Notice — Legislative Intent — Requirement of consent to be named as party — Legislative immunity or privilege.

Except as provided in KRS

5.005

and

286.12-135

, and notwithstanding any other statute to the contrary, the venue for any civil action that:

Challenges the constitutionality of a Kentucky:

Statute;

Executive order;

Administrative regulation; or

Order of any cabinet, program cabinet, or department established under KRS Chapter 12;

Includes a claim for declaratory judgment or injunctive relief; and

Is brought individually, jointly, or severally against:

Any state official in his or her official capacity, including any public servant as defined in KRS

11A.010

; or

Any body, subdivision, caucus, committee, or member of the General Assembly, or the Legislative Research Commission;

shall be as provided in this section.

A plaintiff who is a resident of Kentucky shall file a complaint or petition in the office of the Circuit Court clerk in the county where the plaintiff resides. If more than one (1) plaintiff is a party to the action, the complaint or petition may be filed in any county where any plaintiff resides.

A plaintiff who is not a resident of Kentucky shall file a complaint or petition in the Franklin Circuit Court.

The plaintiff shall certify in the complaint or petition filed under this section that a copy of the complaint or petition has been served upon the Attorney General before or at the time of filing, and the Attorney General shall be entitled to be heard.

In any appeal to the Kentucky Court of Appeals or Supreme Court, or the federal appellate courts in any forum that involves the constitutional validity of a statute, executive order, administrative regulation, or order of any cabinet, program cabinet, or department established under KRS Chapter 12, the Attorney General shall, before the filing of the appellant’s brief, be served with a copy of the pleading, paper, or other document that initiates the appeal in the appellate forum. This notice shall specify the challenged statute, executive order, administrative regulation, or order of a cabinet, program cabinet, or department established under KRS Chapter 12, and the nature of the alleged constitutional defect.

The Attorney General shall notify the Legislative Research Commission of:

The receipt of a complaint or petition and the nature of any proceedings involving the validity of any statute or regulation, or order of a cabinet, program cabinet, or department established under KRS Chapter 12; and

The entering of a final judgment in those proceedings, if the Attorney General is a party to the action.

To protect the rights of the citizens of the Commonwealth of Kentucky as guaranteed by the Constitution of Kentucky, it is the intent of the General Assembly that any action brought or pursued under this section be given priority and prosecuted in an expeditious manner.

Pursuant to Sections 43 and 231 of the Constitution of Kentucky, members of the General Assembly, organizations within the legislative branch of state government, or officers or employees of the legislative branch shall not be made parties to any action challenging the constitutionality or validity of any statute or regulation, without the consent of the member, organization, or officer or employee.

Nothing in this section is intended to waive, nor shall it be interpreted or applied to waive or abrogate in any way, any legislative immunity or legislative privilege of any body, subdivision, caucus, committee, or member of the General Assembly, or the Legislative Research Commission, as provided by the Constitution of Kentucky, KRS

418.075

, any other statute of this Commonwealth, or federal or state common law.

HISTORY:

2021 ch. 2, § 1, effective February 2, 2021; 2022 ch. 88, § 20, effective July 14, 2022.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(7/14/2022). This statute was amended by 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 88, sec. 20. Under Section 22 of ch. 88, that Act may be cited as the Student Education Loan Servicing, Licensing, and Protection Act of 2022.